Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 4

Representation by Real Estate Agents

62-13-401. Creation of agency relationship.

A real estate licensee may provide real estate services to any party in a prospective transaction, with or without an agency relationship to one (1) or more parties to the transaction. Until such time as a licensee enters into a specific written agreement to establish an agency relationship with one (1) or more parties to a transaction, the licensee shall be considered a facilitator and shall not be considered an agent or advocate of any party to the transaction. An agency or subagency relationship shall not be assumed, implied or created without a written bilateral agreement that establishes the terms and conditions of the agency or subagency relationship. The negotiation and execution of either an exclusive agency listing agreement or an exclusive right to sell listing agreement with a prospective seller shall establish an agency relationship with the seller.

Acts 1995, ch. 246, § 3; 1996, ch. 772, § 4; 2006, ch. 738, § 1.

62-13-402. Limited agency.

If a real estate licensee is engaged as an agent, the real estate licensee serves as a limited agent retained to provide real estate services to a client. The licensee shall function as an intermediary in negotiations between the parties to a transaction unless the parties negotiate directly.

A real estate licensee shall owe all parties to a transaction the duties enumerated in § 62-13-403. A licensee shall owe to the licensee's client the duties enumerated in § 62-13-404.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the duties enumerated in §§ 62-13-403 and 62-13-404 shall supersede any fiduciary or common law duties owed by a licensee to the licensee's client on January 1, 1996.

Acts 1995, ch. 246, § 4.

62-13-403. Duty owed to all parties.

A licensee who provides real estate services in a real estate transaction shall owe all parties to the transaction the following duties, except as provided otherwise by § 62-13-405, in addition to other duties specifically set forth in this chapter or the rules of the commission:

Diligently exercise reasonable skill and care in providing services to all parties to the transaction;

Disclose to each party to the transaction any adverse facts of which the licensee has actual notice or knowledge;

Maintain for each party to a transaction the confidentiality of any information obtained by a licensee prior to disclosure to all parties of a written agency or subagency agreement entered into by the licensee to represent either or both of the parties in a transaction. This duty of confidentiality extends to any information that the party would reasonably expect to be held in confidence, except for information that the party has authorized for disclosure, information required to be disclosed under this part and information otherwise required to be disclosed pursuant to this chapter. This duty survives both the subsequent establishment of an agency relationship and the closing of the transaction;

Provide services to each party to the transaction with honesty and good faith;

Disclose to each party to the transaction timely and accurate information regarding market conditions that might affect the transaction only when the information is available through public records and when the information is requested by a party;

Timely account for trust fund deposits and all other property received from any party to the transaction; and

Not engage in self-dealing nor act on behalf of licensee's immediate family or on behalf of any other individual, organization or business entity in which the licensee has a personal interest without prior disclosure of the interest and the timely written consent of all parties to the transaction; and

Not recommend to any party to the transaction the use of services of another individual, organization or business entity in which the licensee has an interest or from whom the licensee may receive a referral fee or other compensation for the referral, other than referrals to other licensees to provide real estate services under this chapter, without timely disclosing to the party who receives the referral the licensee's interest in the referral or the fact that a referral fee may be received.

Acts 1995, ch. 246, § 5; 1996, ch. 772, §§ 5, 6.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

62-13-404. Duty owed to licensee's client.

Any licensee who acts as an agent in a transaction regulated by this chapter owes to the licensee's client in that transaction the following duties, to:

Obey all lawful instructions of the client when the instructions are within the scope of the agency agreement between licensee and licensee's client;

Be loyal to the interests of the client. A licensee must place the interests of the client before all others in negotiation of a transaction and in other activities, except where the loyalty duty would violate licensee's duties to a customer under § 62-13-402 or a licensee's duties to another client in a dual agency; and

Unless the following duties are specifically and individually waived, in writing by a client, a licensee shall assist the client by:

Scheduling all property showings on behalf of the client;

Receiving all offers and counter offers and forwarding them promptly to the client;

Answering any questions that the client may have in negotiation of a successful purchase agreement within the scope of the licensee's expertise; and

Advising the client as to whatever forms, procedures and steps are needed after execution of the purchase agreement for a successful closing of the transaction;

Upon waiver of any of the duties in subdivision (3)(A), a consumer shall be advised in writing by the consumer's agent that the consumer may not expect or seek assistance from any other licensees in the transaction for the performance of the duties in subdivision (3)(A).

Acts 1995, ch. 246, § 6; 1996, ch. 772, § 7; 2006, ch. 738, § 2.

62-13-405. Written disclosure.

If a licensee personally assists a prospective buyer or seller in the purchase or sale of a property and the buyer or seller is not represented by this or any other licensee, the licensee shall verbally disclose to the buyer or seller the licensee's facilitator, agent, subagent or designated agent status in the transaction before any real estate services are provided. Known adverse facts about a property must also be disclosed under the laws governing residential property disclosure, compiled in title 66, chapter 5, part 2, but licensees shall not be obligated to discover or disclose latent defects in a property or to advise on matters outside the scope of their real estate license.

The disclosure of agency status pursuant to subsection (a) must be confirmed in writing with an unrepresented buyer prior to the preparation of an offer to purchase. The disclosure of agency status must be confirmed in writing with an unrepresented seller prior to execution of a listing agreement or presentation of an offer to purchase, whichever comes first. Following delivery of the written disclosure, the licensee shall obtain a signed receipt for the disclosure from the party to whom it was provided. The signed receipt shall contain a statement acknowledging that the buyer or seller, as applicable, was informed that any complaints alleging a violation or violations of § 62-13-312 must be filed within the applicable statute of limitations for the violation set out in § 62-13-313(e). The acknowledgment shall also include the address and telephone number of the commission.

The disclosure of agency or facilitator status, as provided in subsection (a), shall not be construed as or be considered a substitute for a written agreement to establish an agency relationship between the broker and a party to a transaction as referenced in § 62-13-406.

Upon initial contact with any other licensee involved in the same prospective transaction, the licensee shall immediately disclose the licensee's role in the transaction, including any agency relationship, to this other licensee. If the licensee's role changes at any subsequent date, the licensee shall immediately notify any other licensees and any parties to the transaction relative to the change in status.

Real estate transactions involving the transfer or lease of commercial properties, the transfer of property by public auction, the transfer of residential properties of more than four (4) units or the lease or rental of residential properties shall not be subject to the disclosure requirements of §§ 62-13-403, 62-13-404 and this section.

Acts 1995, ch. 246, § 7; 1996, ch. 772, §§ 8-11; 2006, ch. 776, § 3.

Law Reviews.

1996 Real Estate Legislation: What You Don't Know Can Hurt You (William R. Bruce), 32 No. 6 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1996).

62-13-406. Designated broker — Managing broker.

A licensee entering into a written agreement to represent any party in the buying, selling, exchanging, renting or leasing of real estate may be appointed as the designated and individual agent of this party by the licensee's managing broker, to the exclusion of all other licensees employed by or affiliated with the managing broker. A managing broker providing services under this chapter shall not be considered a dual agent if any individual licensee so appointed as designated agent in a transaction, by specific appointment or by written company policy, does not represent interests of any other party to the same transaction.

The use of a designated agency does not abolish or diminish the managing broker's contractual rights to any listing or advertising agreement between the firm and a property owner, nor does this section lessen the managing broker's responsibilities to ensure that all licensees affiliated with or employed by the broker conduct business in accordance with appropriate laws, rules and regulations.

There shall be no imputation of knowledge or information among or between clients, the managing broker and any designated agent or agents in a designated agency situation.

Acts 1995, ch. 246, § 8.

62-13-407. Liability.

A client or other party to whom a real estate licensee provides services as an agent, subagent or facilitator shall not be liable for damages for the misrepresentations of the licensee arising out of the licensee's services unless the client or party knew or had reason to know of the misrepresentation. This section shall not limit the liability of a licensee's managing broker for the misrepresentations of the managing broker's licensees.

Acts 1995, ch. 246, § 9; 1996, ch. 772, § 12.

62-13-408. Application.

This part shall supersede common law to the extent common law is inconsistent with this part.

Acts 1995, ch. 246, § 10.